District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.141

Chief Financial Officer for the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(a)

The Chief Financial Officer shall appoint a chief financial officer for the Department of Housing and Community Development (“Department”), with the approval of the Director of the Department, to provide services solely to the Department. The chief financial officer for the Department shall not be the chief financial officer for any other executive branch office or agency. The chief financial officer for the Department shall have significant knowledge of, and experience with, programs the Department administers in conjunction with the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(b)

The Chief Financial Officer shall make the appointment under subsection (a) of this section at the earlier of the following:

(1)

When the Chief Financial Officer conducts the reorganization of the Office of Chief Financial Officer; or

(2)

December 1, 2002.

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1132, 49 DCR 6968
Short title of subtitle C of title XI of Law 14-190: Section 1131 of D.C. Law 14-190 provided that subtitle C of title XI of the act may be cited as the Chief Financial Officer for the Department of Housing and Community Development Act of 2002.